Missouri, session 2026, HB1664.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 516.120, 516.130, and 537.046, RSMo, are repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 516.120, 516.130, and 537.046,
to read as follows:
516.120. Within five years:
(1) All actions upon contracts, obligations or liabilities, express or implied, except
those mentioned in section 516.110 and section 516.300, and except upon judgments or
decrees of a court of record, and except where a different time is herein limited;
(2) An action upon a liability created by a statute other than a penalty or forfeiture;
(3) An action for trespass on real estate;
(4) An action for taking, detaining or injuring any goods or chattels, including actions
for the recovery of specific personal property[, or for any other injury to the person or rights
of another, not arising on contract and not herein otherwise enumerated];
(5) An action for relief on the ground of fraud, the cause of action in such case to be
deemed not to have accrued until the discovery by the aggrieved party, at any time within ten
years, of the facts constituting the fraud.
516.130. Within three years:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 1664, 1610, 1645 & 2182 2
(1) An action against a sheriff, coroner or other officer, upon a liability incurred by
the doing of an act in his official capacity and in virtue of his office, or by the omission of an
official duty, including the nonpayment of money collected upon an execution or otherwise;
(2) An action upon a statute for a penalty or forfeiture, where the action is given to the
party aggrieved, or to such party and the state;
(3) An action under section 290.300;
(4) An action that accrues on or after August 28, 2026, for any injury to the
person or rights of another, not arising on contract and not otherwise provided for by
law, including actions for personal injury or bodily injury;
(5) An action that accrues on or after August 28, 2026, against an insurer
relating to uninsured motorist coverage or underinsured motorist coverage, including
any action to enforce such coverage.
537.046. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Childhood sexual abuse", any act [committed by the defendant against the
plaintiff which act] that occurred when the plaintiff was under the age of eighteen years and
[which] that act would have been a violation of section 566.030, 566.031, 566.032, 566.034,
566.060, 566.061, 566.062, 566.064, 566.067, 566.068, 566.069, 566.071, 566.083, 566.086,
566.093, 566.095, 566.100, 566.101, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 568.020, 573.023, or
573.200;
(2) "Injury" or "illness", either a physical injury or illness or a psychological injury or
illness. A psychological injury or illness need not be accompanied by physical injury or
illness.
2. Any action to recover damages from injury or illness caused by childhood sexual
abuse [in an action brought pursuant to this section] shall be commenced within [ten] twenty
years of the plaintiff attaining the age of twenty-one or within three years of the date the
plaintiff discovers, or reasonably should have discovered, that the injury or illness was caused
by childhood sexual abuse, whichever later occurs if such action is brought against a
person who:
(1) Committed the childhood sexual abuse against the plaintiff;
(2) Would be criminally responsible for childhood sexual abuse committed by
another against the plaintiff under section 562.041; or
(3) Would be criminally responsible for hindering prosecution of the person
responsible for childhood sexual abuse committed against the plaintiff under section
575.030.
3. Any action to recover damages from injury or illness caused by childhood
sexual abuse in an action brought against a person, other than a person described in

HCS HBs 1664, 1610, 1645 & 2182 3
subsection 2 of this section, shall be commenced within five years of the plaintiff
attaining twenty-one years of age.
[3.] 4. This section shall apply to any action arising on or after August 28, [2025]
2026.
[4.] 5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a nondisclosure
agreement by any party to a childhood sexual abuse action shall not be judicially enforceable
in a dispute involving childhood sexual abuse allegations or claims, and shall be void.
✔